Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-1555
Act, how cited.

Sections 71-1555 to 71-1568.01 shall be known and may be cited as the Nebraska Uniform Standards for Modular Housing Units Act.

Laws 1976, LB 248, § 1;

Laws 1984, LB 822, § 1;

Laws 1998, LB 1073, § 90.